Massachusetts, session 194th, H3070.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
Chapter of Massachusetts General Laws – COVID-19 Vaccination Tax Credit
Section 1. An Act to create a COVID-19 Vaccination Tax Credit (VTC), under the Laws
of Massachusetts, providing for a Tax Credit, to certain qualified individuals, for specific
assistance in encouraging vaccination.
Section 2. It is in the interest of Public Health, and Public Safety, that as many residents
of Massachusetts, be vaccinated, as much, and as soon as it is possible, based on availability of
vaccine, and logistics to administer such vaccine; and vaccines relating to COVID.
of 2

Section 3. It being understandable, that many individuals, have realistic concern, about
the safety of vaccines, and should be encouraged to have the vaccines administered, as long as
the vaccines have been determined by scientific authorities, to be safe.
It is in the economic interests of all persons in Massachusetts, that as wide, an appropriate
vaccination campaign, can lead to a high percentage of vaccination of the population, that our
Commonwealth, may be freed, and/or reduced of the tyranny of COVID-19, in particular; so as
to improve the overall health of our people, and the strength of our economy.
Therefore, this legislation authorizes a COVID-19 Vaccination Tax Credit (VTC), of at
least $100, to each individual, who attaches to their Massachusetts Individual Income Tax, the
Medical Documentation, of having received the available, and required doses, of approved
COVID-19 vaccines.
of 2